tr: Son ürün formatı: Vücut spreyi; Araba kokusu karışımı; Eau de parfum spreyi; Eau de toilette spreyi; Çubuklu oda kokusu karışımı; Roll-on parfüm yağı; Oda/kumaş spreyi; Sabun/koku katkısı; Katı parfüm; Diğer
sl-SI: Končana oblika izdelka: Meglica za telo; Mešanica za osvežilec zraka v avtu; Parfumska voda v pršilu; Toaletna voda v pršilu; Mešanica za difuzor s palčkami; Parfumsko olje v roll-onu; Pršilo za prostore/tkanine; Dodatek za milo/dišavo; Trdi parfum; Drugo
zh-TW: 成品形式: 身體噴霧; 汽車空氣清新劑混合物; 淡香精噴霧; 淡香水噴霧; 擴香竹混合物; 滾珠香水油; 室內 / 織物噴霧; 肥皂 / 香氛添加劑; 香膏; 其他
ja: 完成商品フォーマット: ボディミスト; 車用芳香剤ブレンド; オードパルファムスプレー; オードトワレスプレー; リードディフューザーブレンド; ロールオン香水オイル; ルーム/リネンスプレー; 石鹸/香料添加物; 練り香水; その他
lt-LT: Galutinio produkto formatas: Kūno dulksna; Automobilio oro gaiviklio mišinys; Purškiamasis kvapusis vanduo; Purškiamasis tualetinis vanduo; Lazdelių difuzoriaus mišinys; Rutulinis kvepalų aliejus; Patalpų / audinių purškiklis; Muilo / kvapiųjų medžiagų priedas; Kietieji kvepalai; Kita
nb: Format for ferdig produkt: Kroppsspray; Blanding for bil-luftfrisker; Eau de parfum-spray; Eau de toilette-spray; Blanding for duftpinner; Parfymeolje med roll-on; Rom- / tekstilspray; Såpe- / dufttilsetning; Fast parfyme; Annet
sv: Format för färdig produkt: Body mist; Blandning för luftfräschare i bil; Eau de parfum-spray; Eau de toilette-spray; Blandning för doftpinnar; Parfymolja med roll-on; Rums-/textilspray; Tvål-/dofttillsats; Fast parfym; Övrigt
hr-HR: Format završenog proizvoda: Maglica za tijelo; Mješavina osvježivača zraka za automobil; Parfemska voda u spreju; Toaletna voda u spreju; Mješavina za difuzor sa štapićima; Parfemsko ulje u roll-onu; Sprej za prostor/posteljinu; Dodatak sapunu/mirisu; Kruti parfem; Ostalo
pt-BR: Formato do produto final: Body mist; Mistura para aromatizador de ambiente para carros; Eau de parfum em spray; Eau de toilette em spray; Mistura para difusor de varetas; Óleo perfumado roll-on; Spray de ambiente/tecidos; Aditivo para sabonete/fragrância; Perfume sólido; Outros
da: Det færdige produkts format: Body mist; Blanding til billuftfrisker; Eau de parfum-spray; Eau de toilette-spray; Blanding til duftpinde; Parfumeolie med roll-on; Rum-/tekstilspray; Sæbe-/dufttilsætningsstof; Fast parfume; Andet
th: รูปแบบสินค้าสำเร็จรูป: สเปรย์ฉีดตัว; น้ำหอมปรับอากาศในรถยนต์; สเปรย์โอเดอปาร์ฟูม; สเปรย์โอเดอตอยเลท; ก้านไม้หอมปรับอากาศ; น้ำหอมแบบลูกกลิ้ง; สเปรย์ปรับอากาศ/สเปรย์ฉีดผ้า; สารแต่งกลิ่นสำหรับสบู่/น้ำหอม; น้ำหอมแห้ง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Formát hotového produktu: Telová hmla; Zmes do osviežovačov vzduchu do auta; Parfumovaná voda v spreji; Toaletná voda v spreji; Zmes do tyčinkového difuzéra; Parfumovaný olej (Roll-on); Sprej do miestnosti / na bielizeň; Prísada do mydla/vôní; Tuhý parfum; Iné
pl: Format gotowego produktu: Mgiełka do ciała; Kompozycja do samochodowych odświeżaczy powietrza; Woda perfumowana w sprayu; Woda toaletowa w sprayu; Mieszanka do dyfuzorów patyczkowych; Olejek zapachowy w kulce; Spray do pomieszczeń/pościeli; Dodatek zapachowy/do mydła; Twarde perfumy; Inne
ko: 완제품 형식: 바디 미스트; 차량용 공기 청정제 블렌드; 오 드 퍼퓸 스프레이; 오 드 뚜왈렛 스프레이; 리드 디퓨저 블렌드; 롤온 향수 오일; 룸/리넨 스프레이; 비누/향료 첨가제; 고체 향수; 기타
es: Formato del producto terminado: Bruma corporal; Mezcla para ambientador de auto; Spray de eau de parfum; Spray de eau de toilette; Mezcla para difusor de varillas; Aceite perfumado en roll-on; Spray para ambiente/ropa de cama; Aditivo para jabón/fragancia; Perfume sólido; Otro
it: Formato del prodotto finito: Acqua profumata per il corpo; Miscela deodorante per auto; Eau de parfum spray; Eau de toilette spray; Miscela per diffusore a bastoncini; Olio profumato roll-on; Spray per ambienti/tessuti; Additivo per saponi/fragranze; Profumo solido; Altro
vi: Định dạng sản phẩm hoàn chỉnh: Xịt thơm toàn thân; Hỗn hợp làm thơm ô tô; Xịt Eau de parfum; Xịt Eau de toilette; Hỗn hợp tinh dầu khuếch tán cắm que; Dầu nước hoa dạng lăn; Xịt phòng/vải; Xà phòng/phụ gia tạo mùi; Nước hoa khô; Khác
ru: Формат готового продукта: Дымка для тела; Смесь для автомобильного освежителя воздуха; Парфюмерная вода (спрей); Туалетная вода (спрей); Смесь для аромадиффузора; Роликовые масляные духи; Спрей для комнаты/текстиля; Добавка для мыла/отдушка; Твердые духи; Другое
fr: Format du produit fini: Brume corporelle; Mélange pour diffuseur de parfum de voiture; Vaporisateur d’eau de parfum; Vaporisateur d’eau de toilette; Mélange pour diffuseur à bâtonnets; Huile de parfum à bille; Vaporisateur d’ambiance/de linge; Additif pour savon/parfum; Parfum solide; Autre
zh-CN: 成品规格: 身体喷雾; 汽车空气清新剂混合物; 浓香水喷雾; 淡香水喷雾; 无火香薰混合物; 滚珠香水油; 室内/织物喷雾; 肥皂/香氛添加剂; 固体香水; 其他
fi: Valmis tuoteformaatti: Vartalosuihke; Auton ilmanraikastinseos; Eau de parfum -suihke; Eau de toilette -suihke; Huonetuoksuseos diffuuserille; Roll-on-hajuvesiöljy; Huone-/tekstiilisuihke; Saippua/tuoksulisäaine; Kiinteä hajuvesi; Muu
pt-PT: Formato do produto final: Bruma corporal; Mistura para ambientador de automóvel; Eau de parfum em spray; Eau de toilette em spray; Mistura para difusor de varetas; Óleo perfumado roll-on; Spray de ambiente/têxteis; Aditivo para sabonete/fragrância; Perfume sólido; Outro
nl: Eindproductformaat: Bodymist; Autoluchtverfrissermix; Eau de parfum-spray; Eau de toilette-spray; Geurstokjesmix; Roll-on parfumolie; Kamer-/linnenspray; Zeep-/geuradditief; Vast parfum; Overige
de: Format des fertigen Produkts: Körperspray; Auto-Lufterfrischer-Mischung; Eau de Parfum Spray; Eau de Toilette Spray; Raumduft-Diffusor-Mischung; Roll-on-Parfümöl; Raum-/Textilspray; Seife/Duftstoffzusatz; Festes Parfüm; Sonstige
ro-RO: Formatul produsului finit: Spray de corp; Amestec pentru odorizant auto; Apă de parfum spray; Apă de toaletă spray; Amestec pentru difuzor cu bețișoare; Ulei de parfum roll-on; Spray pentru cameră/lenjerie; Aditiv pentru săpun/parfum; Parfum solid; Altele
el: Μορφή τελικού προϊόντος: Body mist; Μείγμα για αποσμητικό χώρου αυτοκινήτου; Σπρέι eau de parfum; Σπρέι eau de toilette; Μείγμα για αρωματικά στικ; Αρωματικό λάδι roll-on; Σπρέι χώρου/υφασμάτων; Πρόσθετο για σαπούνι/άρωμα; Στερεό άρωμα; Άλλο
cs: Formát dokončeného produktu: Tělová mlha; Směs pro osvěžovač vzduchu do auta; Parfémovaná voda ve spreji; Toaletní voda ve spreji; Směs pro tyčinkový difuzér; Kuličkový parfémový olej; Sprej na textil / do interiéru; Přísada do mýdel/vůní; Tuhý parfém; Jiné
bg-BG: Формат на готовия продукт: Спрей за тяло; Бленд за освежител за въздух в кола; Парфюмна вода (спрей); Тоалетна вода (спрей); Бленд за ароматизатор с пръчици; Рол-он парфюмно масло; Спрей за стая/текстил; Добавка за сапун/аромат; Твърд парфюм; Други
en: Finished product format: Body mist; Car air freshener blend; Eau de parfum spray; Eau de toilette spray; Reed diffuser blend; Roll-on perfume oil; Room/linen spray; Soap/fragrance additive; Solid perfume; Other
hu: Kész termék formátuma: Testpermet; Autós légfrissítőkeverék; Eau de Parfum spray; Eau de Toilette spray; Pálcás illatosítókeverék; Golyós parfümolaj; Szoba-/lakástextil-permet; Szappan / illatanyag-adalék; Szilárd parfüm; Egyéb